csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_n.yaml
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaanaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaanaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: miinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaasiig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaawaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaasiig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaasiwaanaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaanaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: miinaasiiwag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaawaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaanaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaanaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: miinaawag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaasiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaawaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaasiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaasiwaanaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaanaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: miinaasiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaawaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaanaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaanaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: miinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: nimiinimaasiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: omiinaasiwaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: omiinaasiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv: miinimaasiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: nimiinimaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: gimiinimaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: gimiinimaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: omiinaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: omiinaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: nimiinimaanaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: gimiinimaanaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv: miinimaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nimiinimaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: omiinaasiwaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: omiinaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv: miinimaasiiwan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nimiinimaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gimiinimaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gimiinimaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: omiinaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: omiinaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nimiinimaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gimiinimaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv: miinimaawan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: nimiinimaasiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: omiinaasiwaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: omiinaasiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv: miinimaasiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: nimiinimaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: gimiinimaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: gimiinimaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: omiinaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: omiinaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: nimiinimaanaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: gimiinimaanaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv: miinimaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiininaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiininaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigoninaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigoninaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiinini
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiinini
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigonini
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigonini
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiininaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiininaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigoninaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigoninaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigosiinaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaasiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaasiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigosiidogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: omiinigosiidogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaasiwaanaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaanaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: miinaasiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigonaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigodogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: omiinigodogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaanaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaanaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: miinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigosiinan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigosii'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: omiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaasiwaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: miinaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigonan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigoo'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: omiinigoon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: miinaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigosiinaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaasiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaasiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigosiibane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: omiinigosiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaasiwaanaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaanaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: miinaasiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigonaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigobane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: omiinigobanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaanaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaanaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: miinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigosiiminaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigosiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhisiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhisiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: nimiinigoosiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigominaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigominaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigonaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: nimiinigoominaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhisiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhisiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: nimiinigoosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigonaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigonaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: nimiinigoomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigosiiminaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigosiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhisiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhisiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigonaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: nimiinigoosiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigominaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigominaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: nimiinigoominaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigosiiminaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigosiiminaadog
